Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 12
MEDALS - DECORATIONS

28-3-1201. Long service medal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 641, § 132.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-132.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-129.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 602, § 56, effective May 24.

L. 2020:

Entire section repealed, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 110, § 1, effective September 14.

28-3-1202. Meritorious conduct medal.

The department may award a medal, designated as the "meritorious conduct medal", to any person serving in any capacity in or with the department, including in or with the Colorado National Guard, who, when on any duty status except federal service, distinguishes himself or herself by extraordinary heroism or by saving the life of another by physical action or by providing substantial medical treatment of an injury that, had treatment not been administered, would have resulted in the person's death. A second or subsequent award is denoted by a bronze oak-leaf cluster.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 641, § 133.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-133.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-130.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 602, § 57, effective May 24.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 110, § 2, effective September 14.

28-3-1203. Meritorious service medal.

The department may award a medal, designated as the "meritorious service medal", to any person serving in any capacity in or with, or any person acting in support of, any division or office of the department, including the Colorado National Guard, who, when on any duty status except federal service, distinguishes himself or herself by exceptionally meritorious service to the department.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 642, § 134.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-134.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-131.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 602, § 58, effective May 24.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 111, § 3, effective September 14.

28-3-1204. Active service medal.

The department may award a medal, designated as the "active service medal", to any person who is not a member of the military and who has served in or with any division or office of the department, including in the Colorado National Guard in state or federal service, for a period of ten years. The ten years of service do not need to be consecutive. For each subsequent period of ten years of service, the department may award the individual a bronze knot to be worn on the ribbon of the medal.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 642, § 135.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-135.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-132.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 662, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 111, § 4, effective September 14.

28-3-1204.5. Colorado legion of merit medal.

The department may award a medal, designated as the "Colorado legion of merit medal", to any member of the department, including the Colorado National Guard, who has rendered service in a clearly exceptional, unprecedented, or superior manner in support of the department and who has served in a position of senior leadership or senior command, has demonstrated significant responsibility, served in a position of extremely difficult duty, or was a key individual in mission or duty success.

The department may present the Colorado legion of merit medal upon the member's retirement or the completion of any assignment, mission, or service.

The adjutant general may award the Colorado legion of merit medal to a person who is not a member of the department who has rendered service in a clearly exceptional, unprecedented, or superior manner in support of the department.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 111, § 5, effective September 14.

28-3-1205. Lapel button.

The department shall, upon request and without cost, give a lapel button denoting membership in the Colorado National Guard to any actively participating officer and enlisted person.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 642, § 136.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-136.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-133.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 602, § 59, effective May 24.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 111, § 6, effective September 14.

28-3-1206. Medals and lapel buttons - design - issue.

The design, procurement, and regulations governing the issue of the medals and lapel buttons provided for in this article shall be as prescribed by the governor in orders through the office of the adjutant general.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 642, § 137.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-137.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-134.

28-3-1207. Cost of medals and lapel buttons.

The necessary amounts to defray the costs of providing the medals and lapel buttons authorized by this article shall be deemed a proper charge against the appropriation for the support of the department.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 642, § 138.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-138.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-135.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 362, § 22, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 121, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

28-3-1208. Noncommissioned officer/soldier/airman of the year ribbon. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 264, § 1, effective April 15.

L. 2020:

Entire section repealed, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 112, § 7, effective September 14.

28-3-1209. Commendation ribbon.

A ribbon, designated as the "commendation ribbon", shall be awarded to any member of the National Guard of Colorado and to any other persons who have distinguished themselves either by exceptional service to the state of Colorado or by accomplishment of a special act or deed reflecting credit upon the state of Colorado and the National Guard of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 264, § 1, effective April 15.

28-3-1210. Achievement ribbon.

A ribbon, designated as the "achievement ribbon", shall be awarded to provide recognition to members of the National Guard of Colorado and other persons who have, through their own individual outstanding and exemplary actions, attitude, efforts, and service, contributed to the safekeeping and welfare of citizens of the state of Colorado, the preservation of public and private property, and the improvement of the readiness posture of the National Guard of Colorado or who have accomplished a particularly significant or noteworthy achievement or deed reflecting great credit upon the individual or individuals and the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 265, § 1, effective April 15.

28-3-1211. Adjutant general's outstanding unit citation.

A ribbon, designated as the "adjutant general's outstanding unit citation", shall be awarded for outstanding meritorious performance, on or after June 1, 1995, by any unit assigned to the National Guard of Colorado. Said unit shall display superior performance of an exceptionally difficult task deemed extraordinary and not representing the normal day-to-day circumstances, that sets it apart from other units with similar missions and circumstances.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 265, § 1, effective April 15.

28-3-1212. State emergency service ribbon.

A ribbon, designated as the "state emergency service ribbon", shall be awarded to any member of the National Guard of Colorado who is called to state duty in either an active or supportive role for a period of at least one day during a crisis within the state of Colorado, during which crisis the welfare of the residents of Colorado is in peril and where the preservation or protection of public and private property is required.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 265, § 1, effective April 15.

28-3-1213. Foreign deployment service ribbon. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 265, § 1, effective April 15.

L. 2020:

Entire section repealed, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 112, § 8, effective September 14.

28-3-1214. State mobilization support ribbon. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 265, § 1, effective April 15.

L. 2020:

Entire section repealed, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 112, § 9, effective September 14.

28-3-1215. Recruiting ribbon.

A ribbon, designated as the "recruiting ribbon", shall be awarded to an individual in the National Guard who secures enlistment or appointment of at least three individuals within one year or at least five individuals within a period of five years to the National Guard of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 265, § 1, effective April 15.

28-3-1216. Command tour ribbon. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 662, § 3, effective May 27.

L. 2020:

Entire section repealed, (SB 20-082), ch. 34, p. 112, § 10, effective September 14.